Arkansas, session 2025, HB1885.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 12, Chapter 6, Subchapter 7, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
12-6-703. Deadly use of force — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Deadly use of force incident" means an incident in which a
law enforcement officer uses physical force that results in a person's death;
and
(2) "Law enforcement officer" mean a person vested by law with a
duty to maintain public order and to make arrests for offenses.
(b) After a deadly use of force incident, a law enforcement agency
shall:
(1) Immediately place on paid administrative leave a law
enforcement officer whose use of physical force resulted in the deadly use of
*CEB149*
04-01-2025 10:05:21 CEB149

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 HB1885
force incident;
(2)(A) Provide mandatory sessions of professional in-person or
virtual mental health counseling or therapy by a licensed counselor,
psychiatrist, or psychologist to the law enforcement officer:
(i) At no cost to the law enforcement officer; and
(ii) For a period of not less than ninety (90) days.
(B) The minimum ninety-day-period as described in subdivision
(b)(2)(A) of this section shall be extended for up to ninety (90) days if
additional mental health counseling or therapy sessions are recommended by
the licensed counselor, psychiatrist, or psychologist treating the law
enforcement officer; and
(3) Allow the law enforcement officer to return to normal active
duty only after receiving:
(A) Notice from the prosecuting attorney investigating the
deadly use of force incident that he or she does not intend to file criminal
charges against the law enforcement officer as a result of the deadly use of
force incident; and
(B) Documentation from the licensed counselor,
psychiatrist, or psychologist providing mental health counseling or therapy
to the law enforcement officer stating that:
(i) The law enforcement officer has attended
sessions of mental health counseling or therapy during the period of paid
administrative leave; and
(ii) He or she recommends that the law enforcement
officer return to normal active duty.
(c) A law enforcement agency is relieved of any requirement under this
section if the law enforcement officer whose use of physical force resulted
in a deadly use of force incident is charged with a criminal offense as a
result of the deadly use of force incident.

/s/Barnett





04-01-2025 10:05:21 CEB149